Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.1251

Best practices based on updated policies and procedures. (Expires June 30, 2028.)

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, as soon as is practicable, compile information received under RCW 28A.345.130(4) and, based on the received materials, prepare best practices and other informative materials to support school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.345.130.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2028.

[ 2024 c 157 s 6.]